Washington statutes.
RCW 6.25.040

Grounds if debt not due.

An action may be commenced and the property of a debtor may be attached previous to the time when the debt becomes due, when nothing but time is wanting to fix an absolute indebtedness, and when the complaint and the affidavit allege, in addition to that fact, one or more of the following grounds:

(1) That the defendant is about to dispose or has disposed of his or her property in whole or in part with intent to defraud his or her creditors; or

(2) That the defendant is about to remove from the state and refuses to make any arrangements for securing the payment of the debt when it falls due, and the contemplated removal was not known to the plaintiff at the time the debt was contracted; or

(3) That the debt was incurred for property obtained under false pretenses.

[ 2011 c 336 s 148; 1987 c 442 s 804; 1886 p 39 s 3; RRS s 649. Prior: Code 1881 ss 174-192; 1877 pp 35-40; 1873 pp 43-50; 1871 pp 9, 10; 1869 pp 41-47; 1863 pp 112-120; 1860 pp 30-36; 1854 pp 155-162. Formerly RCW 7.12.030.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 64.